Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-7] Violation, penalty.
Any person who violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the department of
health pursuant to this chapter may be permanently disqualified from
participation in the program, required to reimburse any benefits wrongfully obtained,
and shall be fined not more than $500. Any action taken to impose or collect
the penalty provided for in this section may be considered a civil action. [L
1989, c 378, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next